Rhode Island statutes. Title 14 Delinquent and Dependent Children
Chapter 3 Orphanages

14-3-1.
Power to take custody of children.

Any orphanage or society organized and incorporated under the laws of this state for the care of orphans and needy children, and having a license for that purpose from the department of children, youth, and families, is authorized and empowered to take and have, from time to time, the exclusive care, custody, and control of children during their minority, in cases as follows:

When any child shall have been committed to its care during minority, under the decree of any court; and

When any child shall have been committed to its care during minority, by the written consent of both parents of the child, unless their joint natural guardianship has been superseded by an order, decree, decision, or judgment, regarding the care and custody of the child, or by the appointment of a legal guardian of the person of the child, in which event written consent shall be signed by the person legally entitled to the care and custody of the child, or by the legal guardian of the person of the child.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 197, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 248, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 293, § 1; P.L. 1926, ch. 854, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 422, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

14-3-1

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970.

14-3-2.
Proceedings to declare child in care of orphanage dependent or neglected.

If the parents of any child in the care of an institution are dead, and the child has no guardian, or if any child shall have been maintained by an institution for the space of one year without aid in its support from its parents or guardian, or demand for its custody by either parent or guardian, the child may be proceeded against as a dependent or neglected child by petition to the family court under the provisions of chapter 1 of this title.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 197, § 2; C.P.A. 1905, § 1137; G.L. 1909, ch. 248, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 293, § 2; P.L. 1926, ch. 854, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 422, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

14-3-2

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.